Louisiana, session 2026, HB346.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The portion of United States Highway 171 from Louisiana Highway 118
to Sandra Lane within the village of Florien, Louisiana, shall be known and is hereby
redesignated as the "Speaker Joe R. Salter Memorial Highway".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are
hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this redesignation
provided local or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's
actual costs for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to
exceed the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1